Mississippi, session 2026, HB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Congregate meal programs that receive funds from the Senior Nutrition Program through the area agencies on aging in the state and that serve hot meals to older adults in group settings are authorized to make hot meals available to eligible older adults in their homes that are not more than ten (10) miles from the congregate site, either by delivering the meals to their homes or providing the meals to caregivers or other persons who can take the meals to their homes.  The purpose of this section is to make hot meals available to older adults who are not able to participate in the congregate setting.  This section does not mandate that congregate meal programs provide hot meals to eligible older adults in their homes, but the decision to do so is fully discretionary with the program. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.